New Jersey, session 221, S1329.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In the event that the parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a school district objects to a learning material or activity that is part of the curriculum, on the basis that the material or activity is harmful, withdraws his child from the school district and enrolls the child in a nonpublic school, the resident school district shall provide the parent or guardian with a voucher to support the tuition and fees of the nonpublic school.  The voucher shall equal 75 percent of the resident school districts annual spending per pupil prorated based upon the number of days remaining in the school year. An objection to a learning material or activity on the basis that it is harmful includes, but is not limited to, an objection that the material or activity questions, violates, or conflicts with the parent or guardians belief or practice regarding sex, sexuality, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, conscience, ethics, morality, or religion. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.